src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Proper noun inflection

Meadow Mari proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator. (???)

* LEXICON PROP-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  

* LEXICON PROP_  
*  : N-ava_01 ;  decline like common nouns
 *  : ENDLEX ;  in attributive position ?SHOULD THIS HAVE an +Attr tag?

* LEXICON PROP-PLC_  
*  : N-ava_01 ;  decline like common nouns

* LEXICON LEXC_PROP-PLC_  
*  +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: N-ava_01 ;  decline like common nouns

## Male given name for deriving patronyms 

Check whether +Orth/Colloq is orthographically wrong

* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich 

* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich 

* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich 

* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich 

Вили:Вил
* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich 

* LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich 

## Russian type Surnames 

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL  Абдеев:Абдеев

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL  Багрий:Багр

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL  Аморский:Аморск

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL 

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-YJ_SURMAL 

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL 

* LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL 

* LEXICON PROP_KAL_SURMAL 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM 

* LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR 

* LEXICON PropSur-kal 

* LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR 

* LEXICON PropSur-kit 

* LEXICON CYRL-L_SUR 

* LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR 

* LEXICON PropSur-lak 

* LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR 

* LEXICON PropSur-osh 

* LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR 

* LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR 

* LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUR 

* LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL 

* LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL 

* LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL 

* LEXICON PROP_OSH_MAL 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL 

* LEXICON LEXC_PROP_KUDO_MAL 

* LEXICON PROP_OSH_PATRMAL 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM 

## Female Given names 

* LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM 

* LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM 

* LEXICON PROP_OSH_FEM 

* LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM 

* LEXICON LEXC_PROP_KUDO_FEM 

PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATE 

* LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL 

* LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT 

* LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mhr/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
